Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6105.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2150. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2),
on December 1 of each year the department of treasury shall pay
into the treasury of each county in which are located tax reverted,
recreation, forest, or other lands under the control and
supervision of the department a tax in the following amount:
(a) Before December 1, 1994, $2.50 per acre or major portion
of an acre.
(b) After November 30, 1994 and before January 1, 2014, $2.00
per acre or major portion of an acre.
RMH H07148'26 (H-2) pwdixj


(c) After December 31, 2013 and before January 1, 2015, $3.00
per acre or major portion of an acre.
(d) After December 31, 2014, $4.00 equal to $5.26 per acre or
major portion of an acre, adjusted annually by 5% or the inflation
rate, whichever is less, which shall must be distributed as
provided in subsection (5). As used in this subdivision,
subsection, "inflation rate" means that term as defined in section
34d of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.34d.
(2) The tax levied under subsection (1) does not apply to the
following:
(a) Lands purchased after January 1, 1933 for natural resource
purposes.
(b) State lands on which payments in lieu of taxes are made
pursuant to under subpart 14.
(3) The tax levied under this section is in lieu of all other
taxes and special assessments now levied against the state lands
under any existing law.
(4) The department of treasury shall make a detailed statement
of account between this state and each county in which lands
subject to the tax levied under this section are located. The
detailed statement shall of account must include a description of
the lands. The department of treasury shall submit the detailed
statement of account to the county treasurer of the county. The
department of treasury shall cause a warrant to be drawn payable to
the county for the amount indicated on the detailed statement of
account.
(5) The county treasurer of each county shall immediately make
a detailed statement of account between the county and each
township and school district in the county, distributing the amount
RMH H07148'26 (H-2) pwdixj


received by the county proportionally based on the number of acres
of the lands located in each township. and school district. For
disbursements made before December 1, 1994, the distribution shall
be 40% to the county general fund, 40% to the township general
fund, and 20% to the school operating fund. For disbursements made
after November 30, 1994, and before December 1, 2022, the
distribution shall be 50% to the county general fund and 50% to the
township general fund. For a disbursement made on or after December
1, 2022, distributions to county boards for special assessments for
lake level controls that were levied under part 307 against land
described in subsection (1) but that have not been paid under this
section shall receive priority. For the remaining amount of the
disbursement, the distribution shall be 50% to the county general
fund and 50% to the township general fund. The county treasurer
shall immediately issue a warrant to each of the units consistent
with the detailed statement of account.
(6) The tax on tax reverted, recreation, forest, or other
lands under the control of the department on which payments are
made under this subpart shall be paid from the general fund. This
state shall make payment in full for the amount indicated in the
statement of account prepared under subsection (4).
(7) The tax levied under this section is not in lieu of
special assessments for inland lake levels under part 307,
regardless of whether the special assessment was levied before, on,
or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this
subsection.
Final Page
RMH H07148'26 (H-2) pwdixj